Louisiana, session 2026, HB242.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:2583.8 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2583.8. Deputies; oath; compensation; St. Tammany Parish
A. Each duly elected constable of a justice of the peace court in St.
Tammany Parish may appoint one deputy constable, if necessary, for whose acts the
constable shall be responsible. Before entering upon his duties, the deputy shall take
the oath required by the Constitution of Louisiana and the laws of this state and meet
the requirements of R.S. 40:2402 through 2406. A duplicate copy of the oath of
office shall be filed with the office of the attorney general within seventy-two hours
after being administered. Any deputy constable appointed pursuant to this Section
is not entitled to any compensation from any local governing body or political
subdivision, other than the constable's office, nor any compensation from the state.
Each constable may fix the compensation of his deputy. He may pay from the fees
generated by his office any compensation due to the deputy, the premiums on bonds
required by him of a deputy in charge of public funds, insurance premiums, and any
expenses necessary for the performance of duties required of the deputy. He may
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 242 ENROLLED
issue monthly or twice per month, at his discretion, to the deputy warrants or checks
for the amounts due to him.
B. Each deputy constable authorized by this Section shall have the same
qualifications and training as required by law for a constable of a justice of the peace
court. However, a deputy constable need not be a resident of the ward from which
the constable is elected, but he shall be a resident of St. Tammany Parish.
C. The provisions of this Section have no effect on nor limit the authority of
a justice of the peace to appoint a special deputy constable pursuant to R.S. 13:3477.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.